District of Columbia statutes.
5-1056

Administrative review.

A member in conditional retirement may challenge the imposition of penalties imposed by §§  5-1054 and  5-1055 in an administrative proceeding before the District of Columbia Office of Employee Appeals, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.].

History

Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-194, § 516
as added Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-236, § 2(b), 62 DCR 485